Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

General Provisions

54-9-101. Authority to issue bonds.

Each county is authorized to issue its bonds for highway purposes pursuant to title 9, chapter 21.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 1; Shan., § 1695a1; Acts 1919, ch. 175, § 1; Code 1932, § 2962; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-801; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 15; 1988, ch. 750, § 52.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, § 47-14-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, §§ 10, 13; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 13.

Comparative Legislation. County highway bonds:

Ala. Code § 23-1-157.

Ark. Code § 26-78-110 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 36-82-62.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 178.170.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-13-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 108.120.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-98.

Va. Code § 33.1-321 et seq.

54-9-102 — 54-9-114. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-9-102 — 54-9-114 (Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, §§ 1-6; 1919, ch. 175, §§ 1-5; 1921, ch. 134, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 2963, 2964, 2966, 2968-2977; Shan., §§ 1695a1, 1695a2, 1695a4, 1695a6-1695a15; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(63); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 54-802, 54-803, 54-805, 54-807 — 54-816), general provisions concerning county highway bonds, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 53.

54-9-115. Road districts for election of road commissioners.

For the purpose of carrying out this chapter, any county legislative body has the right to divide its county into no less than three (3) nor more than eight (8) road districts. For each road district, there shall be elected one (1) road commissioner, so that no more than one (1) road commissioner shall be elected from the same road district; but to divide the county into road districts the road districts shall in no wise interfere with the civil districts of any county, for any purpose whatever, except for convenience in selecting the commissioners for the purpose of giving all parts of any county representation in the construction of roads under this chapter.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 7; Shan., § 1695a16; Code 1932, § 2978; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-817.

Attorney General Opinions. Highway commisioners as chief administrative officers, OAG 99-058 (3/10/99).

54-9-116. Road commissioners elected from county at large.

Any county may have the right to elect three (3) road commissioners from the county at large, who shall be the road commissioners for the county, and who shall have the supervision of the construction of the roads in the county; provided, that any county that does not desire to elect its road commissioners from the county at large may subdivide its county into road districts as is provided for in § 54-9-115; and provided, further, that, in any county electing its road commissioners from the county at large, no two (2) of the road commissioners shall be from the same civil district.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 7; Shan., § 1695a17; Code 1932, § 2979; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-818.

54-9-117. Nomination and election of road commissioners from districts.

In any county dividing its county into three (3) or more road districts, the road commissioner to be elected from any of the districts shall receive a nomination from any member of the county legislative body within the limits of the road district.

Should there be more than one (1) nomination from any one (1) or more road districts, then the candidate receiving the highest number of votes of the members comprising the whole legislative body shall be declared elected from the road district from which the nomination was received, and shall be one (1) of the road commissioners.

All road commissioners provided for by any county where the county has been subdivided shall be elected in the same manner as provided in this section.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 7; Shan., § 1695a18; Code 1932, § 2980; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-819.

54-9-118. Road commissioners have supervision of construction of roads.

When all road commissioners have been elected, they shall be the road commissioners for that county, and shall have the supervision of the construction of the roads provided for by the county legislative body, and shall serve until all the roads so provided for have been completed according to the specifications laid out by the county legislative body, or until all the money provided for under the bond issue for the county has been expended on the roads of the county.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 7; Shan., § 1695a19; Code 1932, § 2981; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-820.

Attorney General Opinions. Experience requirements for chief administrative officer, OAG 99-058 (3/10/99).

54-9-119. Bond of commissioners.

The commissioners shall execute a good and solvent bond, in an amount to be specified by the county legislative body, payable to the state, for the benefit of the county from which they were elected, conditioned that they will faithfully and impartially execute all the duties imposed upon them, without favor for any part of the county over that of any other part of the county; that they will honestly and faithfully expend and account for all moneys coming into their hands; and that they will as honestly and economically expend the money for the county as if it were their own private funds. The bond shall be prepared in accordance with title 8, chapter 19, approved by the county legislative body, recorded in the office of the county register of deeds, and transmitted to the office of the county clerk for safekeeping.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 26, § 7; Shan., § 1695a20; Code 1932, § 2982; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-821; Acts 1998, ch. 677, § 18; 2012, ch. 974, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 974, § 6 provided that the act, which amended the section, shall apply to the renewal or obtaining of an official bond for any bonding after May 10, 2012.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “office of the county clerk” for “comptroller of the treasury” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 974, § 6. May 10, 2012.

54-9-120. Vacancies — Filling.

Should there occur a vacancy for any cause, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as provided for the election of the original commissioners under this chapter.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 7; Shan., § 1695a21; Code 1932, § 2983; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-822.

54-9-121. Removal of commissioners.

The road commissioners shall be subject to removal for cause by the judge of the circuit court or chancellor of the county, due notice having been given of the charges preferred.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 7; Shan., § 1695a22; Code 1932, § 2984; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-823.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. LeClercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

54-9-122. County legislative body called to fill vacancy — Other members act till vacancy is filled.

Should any vacancy occur in the commission, it shall be the duty of the county mayor to call the county legislative body together immediately to elect a successor to fill the vacancy, and the remaining commissioners shall transact any business as if no vacancy had occurred until the vacancy has been filled.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 7; Shan., § 1695a24; Code 1932, § 2985; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-824; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

54-9-123. Road commissioners not to be members of county legislative body, nor related to members.

No road commissioner shall be a member of the county legislative body or related to any member of the county legislative body within the third degree, either by affinity or consanguinity, computed by the civil law.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 7; Shan., § 1695a25; Code 1932, § 2986; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-825.

Law Reviews.

Local Government — Incompatibility of Office of Justice of Peace and Road Commissioner, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 903.

Attorney General Opinions. Highway commisioners as chief administrative officers, OAG 99-058 (3/10/99).

54-9-124. Contracts let upon advertised competitive biddings — Bid accepted.

All work of grading, macadamizing, concreting, bridge building, etc., shall be let to contractors by the commissioners. It shall be their duty to advertise the letting or lettings in one (1) or more newspapers published in the county and otherwise as their judgment may direct, and receive sealed bids for the work.

They shall adopt, not later than one (1) week after the time set for opening the bids, the bid of the lowest responsible bidder, if in their judgment to do so would be to the best interest of the county and taxpayers.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 8; Shan., § 1695a26; Code 1932, § 2987; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-826.

Collateral References.

Services contracted for as within requirement of submission of bids as condition of public contract. 15 A.L.R.3d 733.

“Work,” what is covered by term, in statute relating to bids or proposals for public contracts. 92 A.L.R. 835.

54-9-125. Work may be let in sections or as a whole — Rejection of all bids and resubmission.

The commissioners may let the work in sections, or they may let different kinds of work to different contractors, or they may let the whole to one (1) bidder, if in their judgment it is to the best interest of the taxpayers to do so; provided, that after having examined all bids and after having thoroughly investigated the methods of other counties in the state or elsewhere, where conditions are similar, a majority of the commissioners may be of the opinion that to accept none of the bids would be to the best interest of the county, and they may resubmit to another bidding; or, in their discretion, they may adopt any other method of letting the work, either in whole or in part, as the results of their investigation and judgment may indicate.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 8; Shan., § 1695a27; Code 1932, § 2988; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-827.

Attorney General Opinions. A county could not award a road design and construction contract on a “design-build” basis, without competitive bidding, to an engineering firm that had partnered with a road construction firm for that purpose, even though the county's governing body believed such an award to be in the best interest of the taxpayers, as the county was required to advertise the proposed letting of such a contract and to receive sealed bids for the proposed road project, OAG 00-086 (5/5/00).

Collateral References.

Right or duty of public authorities to require single bid or to let single contract for entire improvement or for two or more separate improvements. 123 A.L.R. 577.

Unit basis, right to require bid on with reservation to public authorities of right to determine amount or extent of work. 79 A.L.R. 225.

54-9-126. Contract — Contents.

In receiving and letting the contracts, the commissioners shall at all times include the laying of all drain tiles or pipe for the draining of the roads, after the drain tiles or pipe have been placed on the road, by the county, and further include the tamping or packing of the dirt around the pipe or drain tiles, without additional cost to the county where they are being placed under fills for drainage of the roads.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 8; Shan., § 1695a28; Code 1932, § 2989; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-828.

54-9-127. Maximum prices for certain work fixed by county legislative body — Prices of contract work left to commissioners.

The price for moving dirt, per cubic yard, the price per yard for the laying of macadam, or the price for moving loose or solid rock from the roadbed shall not in any event exceed the maximum price fixed for the removal of those things by the county legislative body of any county authorizing bonds for that purpose.

The county legislative body has the right to define what is meant by “loose rock,” and to define what is meant by “solid rock.”

The county legislative body has the right to provide a maximum amount to be paid for an overhaul, both in the removal of dirt and in the laying of macadam on any road to be built within the county, or the price to be paid for moving dirt, the laying of macadam, clearing rights-of-way, amount to be paid for hands employed on force account, and the price to be paid to the engineers or assistant engineers, the amount per cubic yard of concrete where concrete culverts, concrete bridges, or the price per cubic yard on any kind of concrete work ordered to be placed or used on any road, and the price for any or all contract work may be left to the discretion of the commissioners elected to carry out the work for any county building roads under this chapter, but at all times the county legislative body shall reserve the right to fix a maximum price to be paid for any kind of work when in its judgment it is in the best interest of the county to do so.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 8; Shan., § 1695a29; Code 1932, § 2990; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-829.

54-9-128. Officials, commissioners, or employees not to be interested in contracts.

No commissioners or member of the county legislative body or any officer or employee of the commissioners shall be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract or job of work or material, or profits of any contract or job, to be furnished or performed under §§ 54-9-124 — 54-9-127.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 8; Shan., § 1695a30; Code 1932, § 2991; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-830.

Cross-References. Officers of municipal corporations prohibited from taking contracts, § 6-54-107.

Public officers not to be interested in public contracts, § 12-4-101.

54-9-129. Damages for rights-of-way paid by authority of county legislative body, or upon condemnation.

The commissioners elected under this chapter shall not expend the money obtained by the sale of any road bonds for any rights-of-way without first being authorized to do so by the county legislative body, or for any release, or for any damage growing out of the road building in any way or manner, unless it is after condemnation proceedings where it becomes necessary to condemn land for the purpose of barrow pits, or rock quarries for the purpose of obtaining rock for the roads or dirt to make fills where the cuts are not sufficient to make the fills.

The commissioners shall have the right, where it is not possible to obtain rights-of-way otherwise, to condemn land or buildings for rights-of-way.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 9; Shan., § 1695a31; Code 1932, § 2992; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-831.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 13.

54-9-130. Contractors paid monthly — Reservation of percentage to protect county.

The commissioners shall pay all contractors every thirty (30) days upon estimates made by the engineer in charge of the work for the county, or upon estimates of the assistant engineer for the county, reserving not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of work done at that time as may be evidenced by estimates of the engineer or the engineer's assistants; but the engineers shall be sure at all times that their estimates are not for more than the amount of work actually done, and the commissioners shall at all times reserve an ample amount or percentage to protect the interest of the county.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 10; Shan., § 1695a32; Code 1932, § 2993; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-832.

54-9-131. Engineers — Employment — Duties.

The commissioners shall employ a competent engineer, and, if need be, assistant engineers.

The engineers shall be employed to lay out the work on the roads provided for, making estimates on the roads and work done by the contractors building the roads.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 11; Shan., § 1695a33; Code 1932, § 2994; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-833.

54-9-132. Bond of engineers — Forfeiture.

The engineer shall execute a bond to the county for not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or more if a larger bond is demanded by the county legislative body, conditioned that the engineer will honestly and faithfully execute all work entrusted to the engineer's care by the commissioners.

In the event the engineer willfully or grossly negligently fails to execute any work entrusted to the engineer's care in a manner that is not in the best interest of the county employing the engineer, then the bond shall be forfeited to the county, the bond to be signed by good and solvent personal bondspersons, or by a company authorized to do surety business in the state.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 11; Shan., § 1695a34; Code 1932, § 2995; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-834.

54-9-133. Compensation of engineer.

As compensation for the faithful performance of duty, the engineer shall receive an amount agreed upon by the engineer and the road commissioners having charge of the work.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 11; Shan., § 1695a35; Code 1932, § 2996; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-835.

54-9-134. Oath of engineers.

Each engineer so employed shall take and subscribe an oath before entering upon the engineer's duties that all work will be honestly and faithfully executed as entrusted to the engineer's care, without partiality to any section of the county.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 11; Shan., § 1695a36; Code 1932, § 2997; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-836.

54-9-135. Removal of engineers — Cause.

Any engineer employed under this chapter shall be subject to removal or discharge by the commissioners for the county, at any time when, in the judgment of a majority, it appears to the best interest of the county to remove the engineer, first giving the engineer thirty (30) days' notice of removal.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 11; Shan., § 1695a37; Code 1932, § 2997a; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-837.

54-9-136. Expenditure of surplus on other roads.

After all the roads laid out and provided for in the resolution have been graded, macadamized or otherwise improved for the full length of each road, should there remain a surplus, it shall be expended on such other road or roads not set forth in the resolutions, that in the judgment of the commissioners will serve the greatest number of people within the county.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 12; Shan., § 1695a38; mod. Code 1932, § 2998; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-838.

54-9-137. Record of expenditures and expenses kept by commissioners — Open to public — Violations a misdemeanor — Removal.

The commissioners shall keep a well-bound book, in which shall be recorded in detail the amount of money expended by them on the roads, and where and for what purpose the money was expended.

The book shall show to whom the funds have been paid, giving the date and the amount of the payments; and it shall further show any and all expenses paid by the commissioners.

There shall be a proper accounting for all the funds coming to their hands, and how expended.

The book shall be open to the public at all reasonable times and places.

Failure to keep the book and failure to show the book to anyone of the public is a Class A misdemeanor upon the part of the commissioners and, in addition, subjects them to removal.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 13; Shan., § 1695a40; Code 1932, § 3000; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-840; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been classified as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-111.

54-9-138. Commissioners to keep minutes of proceedings — Report bond sales, receipts and disbursements, other information.

It is the duty of the commissioners to keep accurate minutes of all the proceedings had by them, the minutes to be kept in a well-bound book and preserved as a record of their office.

The commissioners shall make a written report quarterly to the county legislative body, showing the number of bonds sold since their last report, to whom sold, and the amount realized from the bonds, and also an itemized list of all their receipts and disbursements.

The report shall likewise contain other information that may be presumed to be of interest to the taxpayers of the county, and the report shall be spread on the minutes of the county legislative body.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 14; Shan., § 1695a41; Code 1932, § 3001; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-841.

54-9-139. Bonds issued for specified road and bridge purposes — Determination of kind of improvement — Form of bonds.

Under this chapter, any county in the state is authorized to issue bonds pursuant to title 9, chapter 21, for the purposes of grading roads, grading and macadamizing roads, grading and concreting roads, building complete concrete roads, building macadam roads with an asphalt surface, building bridges on roads, draining roads, or maintaining or reconstructing roads already constructed, or for any kind of standard road improvement or construction.

The kind of improvement shall at all times be subject to the determination of the county legislative body and shall be approved by the department of transportation.

All plans and specifications for the improvement of the roads or bridges shall be approved by the department.

Acts 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 26, § 15; Shan., § 1695a42; Acts 1919, ch. 175, § 7; Code 1932, § 3002; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-842; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 54; 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-9-140. Local laws for issuance of bonds for road purposes — Cumulative power.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as repealing any local law authorizing the issuance of bonds for road purposes, but the power conferred in this chapter shall only be cumulative to the power conferred in the local laws.

Acts 1919, ch. 175, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 1695a44; Code 1932, § 3003; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-843.